Washington statutes.
RCW 35.43.270

Sanitary sewer or potable water facilities—Notice to certain property owners.

Whenever it is proposed that a local improvement district or utility local improvement district finance sanitary sewers or potable water facilities, additional notice of the public hearing on the proposed improvement district shall be mailed to the owners of any property located outside of the proposed improvement district that would be required as a condition of federal housing administration loan qualification, at the time of notice, to be connected to the specific sewer or water facilities installed by the local improvement district. The notice shall include information about this restriction.

[ 1987 c 315 s 1.]